Connecticut, session 2026, HB05573.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding any provision
of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Transportation shall convey
to the city of Torrington a parcel of land located at 174 North Elm Street
in the city of Torrington, at a cost equal to the administrative costs of
making such conveyance. Said parcel of land has an area of
approximately 0.22 acre and is identified as Lot 020 in Block 004 on city
of Torrington Tax Assessor's Map 119. Said parcel is subject to an
easement indicated as "Easement to Slope Reserved in Favor of State of
Connecticut (D.O.T.) or its Assigns. Area=88.9m²± (957±Sq.Ft.)" on a
map entitled "Compilation Plan, Town of Torrington, Map Showing
Land Released to ____ by the State of Connecticut Department of
Transportation, North Elm Street (CT Route 4), Scale 1:=250, December
2021, Scott A. Hill, P.E., Chief Engineer–Bureau of Engineering and
Construction, Town No. 143, Project No. 143-152, Serial No. 1A, Sheet 1
of 1". The conveyance shall be subject to the approval of the State
Properties Review Board.
(b) The city of Torrington shall use said parcel of land for purposes
of open space and relocating a trail to the site of said parcel. If the city

Substitute House Bill No. 5573
of Torrington:
(1) Does not use said parcel for any of said purposes;
(2) Does not retain ownership of all of said parcel; or
(3) Leases all or any portion of said parcel,
the parcel shall revert to the state of Connecticut.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of Transportation.
The land shall remain under the care and control of said department
until a conveyance is made in accordance with the provisions of this
section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or
instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section, which deed
or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of
subsection (b) of this section. The Commissioner of Transportation shall
have the sole responsibility for all other incidents of such conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-15 2 of 2